en: Soup for baby with vegetables and potatoes
da: Babysuppe med grøntsager og kartofler
de: Suppe für Baby mit Gemüse und Kartoffeln
es: Sopa para bebé con verduras y papas
fr: Soupe pour bébé aux légumes et aux pommes de terre
hr: Juha za bebu s povrćem i krumpirom
nl: Soep voor baby met groenten en aardappelen, Babysoepen met groenten en aardappelen
pt: Sopa para bebê com legumes e batatas

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 6 months with starch and fish
es: Plato de verduras para bebés a partir de los 6 meses con almidón y pescado
fr: Plat avec légumes pour bébés dès 6 mois avec féculents et poisson
hr: Jelo od povrća za bebe od 6 mjeseci sa škrobom i ribom
it: Piatto di verdure per bambini dai 6 mesi con amido e pesce
nl: Groentegerecht voor baby's vanaf 6 maanden met zetmeel en vis
pt: Prato de legumes para bebés a partir dos 6 meses com amido e peixe

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 6 months with starch and meat
fr: Plat aux légumes pour bébés dès 6 mois avec féculents et viande
pt: Prato de legumes para bebês a partir dos 6 meses com amido e carne

en: Vegetable dish for baby with milk and starch from 6 months, Vegetable dish for baby with cream and starch from 6-8 months
fr: Plat de légumes et féculents avec lait pour bébé dès 6 mois, Plat de légumes et féculents avec crème pour bébé dès 6-8 mois
pt: Prato de legumes para bebé com leite e amido a partir dos 6 meses, prato de legumes para bebé com natas e amido a partir dos 6-8 meses

en: Vegetable dish for baby from 6 months with starch
fr: Plat de légumes et féculents pour bébés dès 6 mois
pt: Prato de legumes para bebê a partir dos 6 meses com amido

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 8 months with starch and fish
es: Plato de verduras para bebés a partir de los 8 meses con almidón y pescado
fr: Plat avec légumes pour bébés dès 8 mois avec féculents et poisson
hr: Jelo od povrća za bebe od 8 mjeseci sa škrobom i ribom
it: Piatto di verdure per bambini dai 8 mesi con amido e pesce
nl: Groentegerecht voor baby's vanaf 8 maanden met zetmeel en vis
pt: Prato de legumes para bebés a partir dos 8 meses com amido e peixe

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 8 months with starch and meat
fr: Plat aux légumes pour bébés dès 8 mois avec féculents et viande
pt: Prato de legumes para bebês a partir dos 8 meses com amido e carne

en: Vegetable dish for baby with milk and starch from 8 months, Vegetable dish for baby with cream and starch from 8 months
fr: Plat de légumes et féculents avec lait pour bébé dès 8 mois, Plat de légumes et féculents avec crème pour bébé dès 8 mois
pt: Prato de legumes para bebê com leite e amido a partir dos 8 meses, prato de legumes para bebê com creme e amido a partir dos 8 meses

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 12 months with starch and fish
es: Plato de verduras para bebés a partir de los 12 meses con almidón y pescado
fr: Plat avec légumes pour bébés dès 12 mois avec féculents et poisson
hr: Jelo od povrća za bebe od 12 mjeseci sa škrobom i ribom
it: Piatto di verdure per bambini dai 12 mesi con amido e pesce
nl: Groentegerecht voor baby's vanaf 12 maanden met zetmeel en vis
pt: Prato de legumes para bebés a partir dos 12 meses com amido e peixe

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 12 months with starch and meat
fr: Plat aux légumes pour bébés dès 12 mois avec féculents et viande
pt: Prato de legumes para bebês a partir dos 12 meses com amido e carne

en: Vegetable dish for baby with milk and starch from 12 months, Vegetable dish for baby with cream and starch from 12 months
fr: Plat de légumes et féculents avec lait pour bébé dès 12 mois, Plat de légumes et féculents avec crème pour bébé dès 12 mois
pt: Prato de legumes para bebé com leite e amido a partir dos 12 meses, prato de legumes para bebé com natas e amido a partir dos 12 meses

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 18 months with starch and fish
fr: Plat avec légumes pour bébés dès 18 mois avec féculents et poisson
pt: Prato de legumes para bebés a partir dos 18 meses com amido e peixe

en: Vegetable dish for babies from 18 months with starch and meat
fr: Plat aux légumes pour bébés dès 18 mois avec féculents et viande
pt: Prato de legumes para bebês a partir dos 18 meses com amido e carne

en: Vegetable dish for baby with milk and starch from 18 months, Vegetable dish for baby with cream and starch from 18 months
fr: Plat de légumes et féculents avec lait pour bébé dès 18 mois, Plat de légumes et féculents avec bébé pour enfant dès 18 mois
pt: Prato de legumes para bebé com leite e amido a partir dos 18 meses, prato de legumes para bebé com natas e amido a partir dos 18 meses

en: Bee products, products from bees, Products of the hive, Hive products
bg: Пчелни продукти
ca: Productes apícoles
de: Bienenprodukte, Imkereiprodukte
es: Productos apícolas, Productos de la abeja
fi: Mehiläistuotteet
fr: Produits de la ruche
he: מוצרי דבש, מוצרי כוורת, מוצרי דבורים
hr: Pčelinjih proizvoda
hu: Méhészeti termékek, Méh termékek
it: Prodotti delle api
lt: Bičių gaminiai, produktai iš bičių, avilio produktai, produktai iš avilio
nl: Bijenproducten, Bijenproduct, Bijenprodukt
pl: Produkty pszczele
pt: Produtos des abelhas, produtos de colmeia
ro: Produse apicole, Produse de apicultură, Produse apicultură, Produse de apicultura, Produse apicultura
ru: Продукция пчеловодства, Продукты пчеловодства
tr: Arı ürünleri
zh: 蜂产品

en: Royal jelly
ar: هلام ملكي
az: Arı südü
ba: Инә ҡорт һөтө
be: Матачнае малачко
bg: Пчелно млечице
ca: gelea reial
cs: Mateří kašička
da: bidronningeføde
de: Gelée Royale, Bienenköniginnenfuttersaft
el: Βασιλικός πολτός
eo: Reĝa ĵeleo
es: Jalea real
et: Mesilaspiim
eu: Erregina-jele
fa: شاه‌انگبین
fi: Kuningatarhyytelö
fr: gelée royale, Gelées royales
ga: Glóthach ríoga
gl: Xelea real
he: מזון מלכות
hr: matične mliječi, matična mliječ
hu: Méhpempő
hy: Մեղվակաթ
id: Royal jelly
it: Pappa Reale
ja: ローヤルゼリー
ka: ფუტკრის რძე
kk: Ара сүті
ko: 로열젤리
lt: Bičių pienelis
lv: peru pieniņš
ml: രാജകീയ ജെല്ലി
ms: Madu ratu lebah
mt: ħalib tan-naħal
nb: Dronninggelé
nl: Koninginnengelei
pl: Mleczko pszczele
pt: Geleia real
ro: Lăptișor de matcă
ru: маточное молочко
sh: Matična mliječ
sk: materská kašička
sl: Matični mleček
sq: βασιλικός πολτός
sr: Матични млеч
sv: Bidrottninggelé
th: นมผึ้ง
tr: Arı sütü
uk: Маточне молочко
uz: Apilak
vi: Sữa ong chúa
zh: 蜂王漿

en: Pollens
da: Pollen
de: Pollen
es: Polen
fr: Pollens
hr: Peludi
hu: Virágpor, Pollen
it: Pollini, polline
lt: Žiedadulkės
nl: Pollen
pt: Pólens
ro: Polen
zh: 花粉

en: Partially dried pollen
da: Delvist tørret pollen
de: Teilweise getrockneter Pollen
es: Polen parcialmente seco
fr: Pollen partiellement séché
hr: Djelomično osušeni pelud
hu: Részlegesen szárított virágpor
it: Pollen parzialmente essiccato
nl: Gedeeltelijk gedroogd stuifmeel
pt: Pólen parcialmente seco

en: Fresh pollen
da: Frisk pollen
de: Frischer Pollen
es: Polen fresco
fr: Pollen frais
hr: Svježi pelud
hu: Friss virágpor
it: Pollen fresco
nl: Verse pollen
pt: Pólen fresco

en: Propolis
xx: Propolis
bg: Прополис
hu: Propolisz
it: Propoli
lt: Bičių Pikis
pt: Própolis
zh: 蜂胶